Nebraska, session 109, LB327.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB327 LB327
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-2407, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-2407 Any person who serves as an interpreter for persons unable
to communicate the English language in court proceedings or probation
services as provided in subsection (7) (6) of section 29-2259 shall meet
the standards adopted by the Supreme Court. Such standards shall require
that interpreters demonstrate the ability to interpret effectively,
accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressively, using any
necessary special vocabulary. A person appointed to interpret for deaf
and hard of hearing persons shall be a licensed interpreter as defined in
section 20-151 or, if a licensed interpreter is unavailable, an
interpreter licensed under the laws of another state.
Sec. 2. Section 29-2259, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2259 (1) The salaries and expenses incident to the conduct and
maintenance of the office shall be paid by the state. Other expenses
shall be paid by the state as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The salaries and travel expenses of the probation service shall
be paid by the state. Travel expenses shall be paid as provided in
sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(3) Except as provided in sections 29-2262 and 29-2262.04, the costs
of drug testing and equipment incident to the electronic surveillance of
individuals on probation shall be paid by the state.
(4) For purposes of this section, implementation date means a date
selected by the State Court Administrator that is between July 1, 2026,
and July 1, 2027.
(5) Before the implementation date:
(a) (4) The expenses incident to the conduct and maintenance of the
principal office within each probation district shall in the first
instance be paid by the county in which it is located, but such county
shall be reimbursed for such expenses by all other counties within the
-2-

LB327 LB327
2025 2025
probation district to the extent and in the proportions determined by the
Supreme Court based upon population, number of investigations, and
probation cases handled or upon such other basis as the Supreme Court
deems fair and equitable; and .
(b) (5) Each county shall provide office space and necessary
facilities for probation officers performing their official duties and
shall bear the costs incident to maintenance of such offices other than
salaries, travel expenses, and data processing and word processing
hardware and software that is provided on the state computer network.
(5)(a) This subsection applies beginning on the implementation date.
(b) The state shall pay for the expenses of providing probation
services, including:
(i) Expenses incident to the conduct and maintenance of the
principal office within each probation district;
(ii) Expenses for providing office space and necessary facilities
for probation staff performing their official duties;
(iii) Salaries and travel expenses of probation staff; and
(iv) Expenses for the procurement, provision, management, security,
and support for comprehensive information technology services. This
includes technical support; hardware management, including printers,
scanners, telephones, and mobile devices; software licensing; network
management; and Internet services.
(c) The state shall pay for the costs described in subdivision (5)
(b) of this section with money appropriated to the Supreme Court for such
purpose.
(d) County officials shall work collaboratively with the State Court
Administrator to provide for a smooth and coordinated transition of the
payment responsibilities provided for in this subsection.
(6) The Supreme Court may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this
section.
(7) (6) The cost of interpreter services for deaf and hard of
-3-

LB327 LB327
2025 2025
hearing persons and for persons unable to communicate the English
language shall be paid by the state with money appropriated to the
Supreme Court for that purpose or from other funds, including grant
money, made available to the Supreme Court for such purpose. Interpreter
services shall include auxiliary aids for deaf and hard of hearing
persons as defined in section 20-151 and interpreters to assist persons
unable to communicate the English language as defined in section 25-2402.
Interpreter services shall be provided under this section for the
purposes of conducting a presentence investigation and for ongoing
supervision by a probation officer of such persons placed on probation.
(8) (7) The probation administrator shall prepare a budget and
request for appropriations for the office and shall submit such request
to the Supreme Court and with its approval to the appropriate authority
in accordance with law.
Sec. 3. Original section 25-2407, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 29-2259, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-